California statutes. Public Utilities Code
-------------------------------------------

5372.

Applications for permits and certificates shall be in writing, verified under oath, and shall be in such form, contain such information, and be accompanied by such proof of service upon interested parties as the commission may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

5373.1.

(a) Each application for a charter-party carrier of passengers certificate or permit shall be accompanied by a filing fee as follows:

(1) Class A certificates (new): one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(2) Class A certificates (renewal): one hundred dollars ($100).

(3) Class B certificates (new): one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(4) Class B certificates (renewal): one hundred dollars ($100).

(5) Class C certificates (new): one thousand dollars
 ($1,000).

(6) Class C certificates (renewal): one hundred dollars ($100).

(7) Permits (new): one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(8) Permits (renewal): one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) The commission shall also require each application to be accompanied by a fee to offset the cost of the charter-party carrier bus terminal inspections conducted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol. The fee shall be fifteen dollars ($15) per tour bus, as defined in Section 612 of the Vehicle Code, or a maximum of six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500) for each operating carrier.

(c) The commission shall
 require each charter-party carrier that operates tour buses, as defined in Section 612 of the Vehicle Code, to undergo an annual bus terminal inspection conducted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol and to pay an annual fee of fifteen dollars ($15) per tour bus, or a maximum of six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500), to offset the cost of the inspections.

(d) The commission shall deposit the fees collected pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund to cover the costs of the inspections conducted by the department as specified in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 860, Sec. 4.   (SB 611)   Effective September 30, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5373.5.

The commission shall not issue or authorize the transfer of any certificate or permit under this chapter to any person or corporation against whom a final judgment has been entered and whose name has been transmitted to the commission pursuant to Section 3716.4 of the Labor Code, unless that judgment has been satisfied or has been discharged in accordance with the bankruptcy laws of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1071, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

5374.

(a) (1) Before a permit or certificate is issued or renewed, the commission shall require the applicant to establish reasonable fitness and financial responsibility to initiate and conduct or continue to conduct the proposed or existing transportation services. The commission shall not issue or renew a permit or certificate pursuant to this chapter unless the applicant meets all of the
 following requirements:

(A) It is financially and organizationally capable of conducting an operation that complies with the rules and regulations of the Department of the California Highway Patrol governing highway safety.

(B) It is committed to observing the hours of service regulations of state and, where applicable, federal law, for all persons, whether employees or subcarriers, operating vehicles in transportation for compensation under the certificate.

(C) It has a preventive maintenance program in effect for its vehicles used in transportation for compensation that conforms to regulations of the Department of the California Highway Patrol in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(D) It participates in a program to regularly check the
 driving records of all persons, whether employees or subcarriers, operating vehicles used in transportation for compensation.

(E) It has a safety education and training program in effect for all employees or subcarriers operating vehicles used in transportation for compensation.

(F) It will maintain its vehicles used in transportation for compensation in a safe operating condition and in compliance with the Vehicle Code and with regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations relative to motor vehicle safety.

(G) It has filed with the commission the certificate of workers’ compensation insurance coverage or statement required by Section 5378.1.

(H) It has provided the commission an address of an office or terminal where documents
 supporting the factual matters specified in the showing required by this subdivision may be inspected by the commission and the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(I) It provides for a mandatory controlled substance and alcohol testing certification program as adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 1032.1.

(J) Subparagraphs (C), (F), and (H) do not apply to a charter-party carrier of passengers engaged in the provision of a hired driver service when a rented motor vehicle is being operated by the hired driver.

(2) With respect to subparagraphs (B) and (F) of paragraph (1), the commission may base a finding on a certification by the commission that an applicant has filed, with the commission, a sworn declaration of ability to comply and intent to comply.

(3) The commission may require, as a precondition to the issuance of a permit or certificate, the procurement of a performance bond sufficient to facilitate the collection of fines, penalties, and restitution related to enforcement actions that can be taken against the applicant.

(b) In addition to the requirements in subdivision (a), charter-party carriers shall meet all other state and, where applicable, federal regulations as prescribed.

(c) The commission may delegate to its executive director or that executive director’s designee the authority to issue, renew, or authorize the transfer of, charter-party carrier permits or certificates and to make the findings specified in subdivision (a) that are necessary to that delegated authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 472, Sec. 4.   (AB 2572)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5374.5.

(a) At the time of each bus terminal inspection conducted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 34501 of the Vehicle Code, every charter-party carrier of passengers shall furnish both the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the commission a list, prepared under oath, of all vehicles used in transportation for compensation during the period
 since the last inspection. The commission shall furnish a copy of the list to the carrier’s insurer, if the carrier’s accident liability protection is provided by a policy of insurance. This subdivision does not apply to a charter-party carrier of passengers engaged in the provision of a hired driver service when a rented motor vehicle is being operated by the hired driver.

(b) If the charter-party carrier’s insurer informs the commission that the carrier has failed to obtain insurance coverage for any vehicle reported on the list, the commission may, in addition to any other penalty provided in this chapter, for a first occurrence, suspend the carrier’s certificate or permit or impose a fine, or both, and for a second or subsequent occurrence may suspend or revoke the certificate or impose a fine, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 472, Sec. 5.   (AB 2572)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5374.6.

Every charter-party carrier earning over three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) in annual gross operating revenue shall, under oath, file annually a report indicating the number, classification, and compensation of all employees and owner-operator drivers hired or engaged during the reporting period. The commission shall submit a copy of the report to the administrator of the carrier’s workers’ compensation self-insurance plan if the carrier is self-insured, or to the carrier’s workers’ compensation insurer if the carrier’s workers’ compensation protection is provided by a policy or policies of insurance. The commission shall not be obligated to
 undertake an independent investigation of the adequacy of workers’ compensation insurance coverage based on the information contained in the report, if the carrier has complied with Section 5378.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1240, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5375.

The commission may, with or without hearing, issue or refuse to issue a permit or certificate. If the commission finds that public convenience and necessity require the proposed transportation service and the applicant possess satisfactory fitness and financial responsibility to initiate and conduct the proposed transportation services, and will faithfully comply with the rules and regulations adopted by the commission with respect thereto, it shall issue the permit or certificate to conduct the requested operations, or may issue it for the partial exercise of the privilege sought, and may attach to the permit or certificate such terms and conditions as, in its judgment, are
 required in the public interest; provided also that the permit or certificate shall not require the filing or publication of time schedules or tariffs. The fact that the applicant for the certificate is, or may later become a holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity as a passenger stage corporation issued pursuant to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1031), Chapter 5, Part 1, Division 1, of this code shall not be deemed inconsistent with the provisions of this section, and such dual authority may be authorized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

5376.

A permit or certificate, or renewal thereof, is effective for three years, unless suspended or revoked by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 324, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5377.

No permit issued pursuant to this article, or rights to conduct any of the services therein authorized, shall be sold, leased, or assigned, or otherwise transferred or encumbered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5377.1.

No certificate issued pursuant to, or rights to conduct any of the services authorized by, this article shall be sold, leased, or assigned, or otherwise transferred or encumbered, unless authorized by the commission. A filing fee of three hundred dollars ($300) shall accompany all applications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 660, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5378.

(a) The commission may cancel, revoke, or suspend any operating permit or certificate issued pursuant to this chapter upon any of the following grounds:

(1) The violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, or of any operating permit or certificate issued thereunder.

(2) The
 violation of any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement established by the commission pursuant to this chapter.

(3) The conviction of the charter-party carrier of passengers of any misdemeanor under this chapter while holding operating authority issued by the commission or the conviction of the carrier or its officers of a felony while holding operating authority issued by the commission, limited to robbery, burglary, larceny, fraud, or intentional dishonesty for personal gain.

(4) The rendition of a judgment against the charter-party carrier of passengers for any penalty imposed under this chapter.

(5) The failure of a charter-party carrier of passengers to pay any fee imposed upon the carrier within the time required by law.

(6) On request of the holder of the permit or certificate.

(7) Failure of a permit or certificate holder to operate and perform reasonable service. That failure may include repeated violations of the Vehicle Code or of regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations relative to motor vehicle safety, by employees of the permitholder or certificate holder, that support an inference of unsafe operation or willful neglect of the public safety by the permitholder or certificate holder.

(8) Consistent failure of the charter-party carrier of passengers to maintain its vehicles in a safe operating condition and in compliance with the Vehicle Code and with regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations relative to motor vehicle safety, as shown by the records of the commission, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of
 the California Highway Patrol, or the carrier. This paragraph does not apply to a charter-party carrier of passengers engaged in the provision of a hired driver service when a rented motor vehicle is being operated by the hired driver.

(9) The knowing and willful filing of a false report that understates revenues and fees.

(10) Failure of a permit or certificate holder, or of any of its employees, to follow any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, ordinance, or other requirement established by the governing body of an airport, including solicitation practices.

(b) The commission may levy a civil penalty of up to seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) upon the holder of an operating permit or certificate issued pursuant to this chapter, for any of the grounds specified in subdivision (a), as an
 alternative to canceling, revoking, or suspending the permit or certificate. The commission may also levy interest upon the civil penalty, which shall be calculated as of the date on which the civil penalty is unpaid and delinquent. The commission shall deposit at least monthly all civil penalties and interest collected pursuant to this section into the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 472, Sec. 6.   (AB 2572)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5378.1.

(a) Beginning July 1, 1990, and continuing thereafter, every charter-party carrier shall file with the commission one of the following:

(1) A certificate of workers’ compensation coverage for its employees issued by an admitted insurer.

(2) A certification of consent to self-insure issued by the Director of Industrial Relations.

(3) A statement under penalty of perjury, stating that, in its operations as a charter-party carrier, it does not
 employ any person in any manner so as to become subject to the workers’ compensation laws of this state.

(b) The workers’ compensation certified to under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be effective until canceled. Cancellation shall require 30 days’ advance notice.

(c) If, after filing the statement described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the carrier becomes subject to the workers’ compensation laws of this state, the carrier shall promptly notify the commission that the carrier is withdrawing its statement under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), and shall simultaneously file the certificate described in either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) The commission may adopt rules and regulations that it determines to be necessary to carry out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1240, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5378.5.

(a) Upon receipt of a written recommendation from the Department of the California Highway Patrol that the certificate or permit of a charter-party carrier be suspended either (1) for failure to maintain any vehicle used in transportation for compensation in a safe operating condition or to comply with the Vehicle Code or with regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations relative
 to motor carrier safety if that failure is either a consistent failure or presents an imminent danger to public safety, or (2) for failure to enroll all drivers in the pull notice system as required by Section 1808.1 of the Vehicle Code, the commission shall, pending a hearing in the matter pursuant to subdivision (d), suspend the carrier’s certificate or permit. The written recommendation shall specifically indicate compliance with subdivision (c).

(b) A carrier whose certificate or permit is suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) may obtain a reinspection of its terminal and vehicles by the department, by submitting a written request for reinstatement to the commission and paying a reinstatement fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000). The commission shall deposit all reinstatement fees collected pursuant to this subdivision in the Public Utilities Commission Transportation Reimbursement Account. The commission shall then forward a request for
 reinspection to the department which shall then perform a reinspection within a reasonable time. The commission shall reinstate a carrier’s certificate or permit suspended under subdivision (a) promptly upon receipt of a written recommendation from the department that the carrier’s safety compliance has improved to the satisfaction of the department, unless the certificate or permit is suspended for another reason, or has been revoked.

(c) Before transmitting a recommendation pursuant to subdivision (a) to the commission, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall notify the charter-party carrier in writing of all of the following:

(1) That the department has determined that the carrier’s safety record is unsatisfactory, furnishing a copy of any documentation or summary of any other evidence supporting the determination.

(2) That the determination may result in suspension or revocation of the carrier’s certificate or permit by the commission.

(3) That the carrier may request a review of the determination by the department within five days of its receipt of the notice required under this subdivision. If a review pursuant to this paragraph is requested by the carrier, the department shall conduct and evaluate that review prior to transmitting any notification to the commission pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Whenever the commission suspends the certificate or permit of any charter-party carrier pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall furnish the carrier written notice of the suspension and shall hold a hearing within a reasonable time, not to exceed 21 days, after a written request therefor is filed with the commission, with a
 copy thereof furnished to the Department of the California Highway Patrol. At the hearing, the carrier shall show cause why the suspension should not be continued. At the conclusion of the hearing, the commission may, in addition to any other penalty provided in this chapter, terminate the suspension, continue the suspension in effect, or revoke the certificate or permit. The commission may revoke the certificate or permit of any carrier suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) at any time 90 days or more after its suspension if the commission has not received a written recommendation for reinstatement from the department and the carrier has not filed a written request for a hearing with the commission.

(e) If the commission, after a hearing, finds that a charter-party carrier has continued to operate as such a carrier after its certificate or permit has been suspended pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall do one of the following:

(1) Revoke the operating certificate or permit of the carrier.

(2) Impose upon the holder of the certificate or permit a civil penalty of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) nor more than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for each day of unlawful operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 263, Sec. 2.   (AB 951)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5378.6.

(a) The commission shall deny a new or renewal application for a charter-party carrier certificate or permit upon receipt of a written recommendation from the Department of the California Highway Patrol that specifically indicates compliance with subdivision (b), and indicates that the applicant has failed to do either of the following:

(1) Maintain any vehicle used in transportation for compensation in a safe operating condition or to comply with the Vehicle Code or the regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations relative to motor carrier safety. This paragraph does not apply to a charter-party carrier of passengers engaged in the provision of a hired driver service when a rented motor vehicle is being operated by the hired driver.

(2) Enroll all drivers in the Department of Motor Vehicles’ Employer Pull Notice Program implementing Section 1808.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) Before transmitting a recommendation pursuant to subdivision (a) to the commission, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall notify the applicant for the charter-party carrier certificate or permit of all of the following in writing:

(1) That the department has determined that the applicant’s safety record is unsatisfactory, furnishing a copy of any documentation or summary of any other evidence supporting the determination.

(2) That the determination may result in a denial of the applicant’s certificate or permit by the commission.

(3) That the applicant may request a review of the determination by the department within five days of its receipt of the notice required under this subdivision. The department shall, upon request, conduct and evaluate that review prior to transmitting any notification to the commission pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Whenever the commission denies an application for renewal pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall furnish the charter-party carrier written notice of the denial and shall hold a
 hearing within a reasonable time, not to exceed 21 days, after a written request is filed with the commission, with a copy thereof furnished to the Department of the California Highway Patrol. At the hearing, the carrier shall show cause why the denial was improper or unwarranted. At the conclusion of the hearing, the commission may, in addition to any other remedy provided in this part, reverse the denial, or sustain the denial.

(d) Any applicant for a charter-party carrier certificate or permit denied pursuant to subdivision (a), whose denial has not been reversed as a result of the hearing provided for in subdivision (c), that wishes to obtain a certificate or permit shall reapply for the desired authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 472, Sec. 7.   (AB 2572)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5378.7.

(a) Upon receipt of a stop order issued by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 3710.1 of the Labor Code, the commission shall investigate to determine whether the charter-party carrier of passengers has filed a false statement relative to workers’ compensation insurance coverage, in violation of statute, or rules or orders of the commission. If, after notice and opportunity to be heard, the commission determines that there has been a violation of statute, or rules or orders of the commission, the commission shall impose appropriate penalties, which may include a fine and suspension of operating authority for a
 violation. 

(b) Upon receipt of a complaint from the Director of Industrial Relations, that a final judgment has been entered against any charter-party carrier of passengers as a result of an award having been made to an employee pursuant to Section 3716.2 of the Labor Code, the commission shall, 30 days from the date the carrier is mailed the notice, revoke the carrier’s permit unless the judgment has been satisfied or has been discharged in accordance with the bankruptcy laws of the United States or the carrier requests a hearing pursuant to subdivision (c). 

(c) Within seven days of receipt of a complaint from the Director of Industrial Relations that a final judgment has been entered against any charter-party carrier of passengers as a result of an award having been made to an employee pursuant to Section 3716.2 of the Labor Code, the commission shall furnish the carrier named
 in the final judgment written notice of the right to a hearing regarding the complaint and the procedure to follow to request a hearing. The notice shall state that the commission must revoke the carrier’s permit to operate pursuant to subdivision (b) after 30 days from the date the notice is mailed unless the carrier provides proof that the judgment is satisfied or has been discharged in accordance with the bankruptcy laws of the United States and the commission has been so notified seven days prior to the conclusion of the 30-day waiting period. The notice shall also inform the carrier of a right to a hearing and the procedures to follow to request a hearing. The carrier shall have 10 days from the date the notice is sent by the commission to request a hearing. The request for the hearing shall stay the revocation. The hearing shall be held within 30 days of the receipt of the request. If the commission finds that an unsatisfied judgment exists concerning a debt arising under Section 3717 of the Labor
 Code, the commission shall immediately revoke the carrier’s permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1071, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

5379.

After the cancellation or revocation of a permit or certificate, or during the period of its suspension, or after the expiration of its permit or certificate, it is unlawful for a charter-party carrier of passengers to conduct any operations as a carrier. The commission may either grant or deny an application for a new permit or certificate whenever it appears that a prior permit or certificate of the applicant has been canceled or revoked pursuant to Section 5378 or whenever it appears, after hearing, that as a prior permit or certificate holder, the applicant engaged in any of the unlawful activities set forth in Section 5378 for which his or her permit or
 certificate might have been canceled or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5379.5.

The commission may, on a complaint alleging that any corporation or person is operating as a charter-party carrier of passengers without a valid certificate or permit in violation of this chapter, or on its own motion without a complaint, with or without notice of a hearing, order the corporation or person so operating to cease and desist from that operation until the commission makes and files its decision in the matter or until further order of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 378, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regulation of Charter-Party Carriers of Passengers [5381. - 5389.]

5381.

To the extent that such is not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, the commission may supervise and regulate every charter-party carrier of passengers in the State and may do all things, whether specifically designated in this part, or in addition thereto, which are necessary and convenient in the exercise of such power and jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5381.5.

(a) The commission shall, by rule or other appropriate procedure, ensure that every charter-party carrier of passengers operates on a prearranged basis within the state, consistent with Section 5360.5. The commission shall require every charter-party carrier of passengers to include on a waybill or trip report at least all of the following:

(1) The name of at least one passenger in the traveling party, or identifying information of the traveling party’s affiliation, along with the point of origin and destination of the passenger or traveling party.

(2) Information as to whether the transportation was arranged by telephone, written contract, or electronic
 communication.

(b) A waybill or trip report may be kept in electronic or hardcopy format. When requested by any commission or airport enforcement officer or any official of a city, county, or city and county authorized to inspect a waybill or trip report pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 5371.4, the waybill or trip report may be provided in either electronic or hardcopy format.

(c) A charter-party carrier of passengers shall produce in its office a hardcopy of any waybill or trip report when requested by the commission or one of its authorized representatives pursuant to Section 5389.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 52.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5382.

To the extent that such are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, all general orders, rules and regulations, applicable to the operations of carriers of passengers under authority of certificates of public convenience and necessity issued pursuant to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing at Section 1031), Chapter 5, Part 1, Division 1 of this code, unless otherwise ordered by the commission shall apply to charter-party carriers of passengers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2146.)
-------------------------------------------

5383.

The commission shall create the following classifications or types of certificates for charter-party carriers of passengers:

Class A: from any point or points within the state to other points in or out of this state, including, but not limited to, the conduction of round-trip sightseeing tour service.

Class B: from any point within the territory
 of origin specified in the certificate to any points in the state, or territory of origin.

Class C: services provided incidental to commercial balloon operations, commercial river rafting, or skiing where no additional compensation is provided for the transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 456, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5384.

The commission shall issue permits to persons, who are otherwise qualified, whose passenger carrier operations fall into the following categories:

(a) Specialized carriers, who do not hold themselves out to serve the general public, but only provide service under contract with industrial and business firms, governmental agencies, and private schools or who only transport agricultural workers to and from farms for compensation or who only conduct transportation services, which are incidental to another
 business. This permit shall be designated as a “Z” permit.

(b) Carriers using only vehicles under 15-passenger seating capacity. This permit shall be designated as a “P” permit.

(c) Carriers conducting round-trip sightseeing tour service. This permit shall be designated as an “S” permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 456, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5384.1.

(a) At the time transportation service is prearranged or the contract of carriage is made, the charter-party carrier of passengers shall ask the chartering party and, upon being asked, the chartering party shall disclose to the charter-party carrier of passengers, whether the following are true:

(1) Alcoholic beverages will be served by the
 chartering party or be transported in the passenger compartment of the vehicle during transportation.

(2) A member of the party to be provided with transportation services will be under 21 years of age.

(b) If, at the time transportation was prearranged with the charter-party carrier of passengers, the chartering party discloses that alcoholic beverages will be served or transported in the passenger compartment and a member of the party is under 21 years of age, each of the following applies:

(1) The charter-party carrier of passengers, at the time transportation services are arranged, shall notify the chartering party of all of the following:

(A) A designee who is 25 years of age or older shall be present whenever persons under 21 years of age who are
 not accompanied by a parent or legal guardian are being transported.

(B) The designee shall make reasonable efforts to ensure compliance with all laws prohibiting the consumption of alcoholic beverages by persons under 21 years of age who are members of the party and are not accompanied by a parent or legal guardian.

(C) The designee shall check the identifications of all passengers to determine who is under 21 years of age and shall read the statement specified in paragraph (7) to each passenger in the party who is under 21 years of age. The driver shall not commence transport until the designee has verified with the driver that the designee has checked the identifications of all passengers and has read the statement. If passengers are picked up at more than one location, the driver shall not commence transport from the subsequent location until the designee has verified with the
 driver that the designee has checked the identifications of all passengers boarding the vehicle at that location and has read the statement to all passengers boarding the vehicle at that location.

(D) The designee shall notify the driver of the vehicle if, at any time during the trip, a passenger in their party who is under 21 years of age is consuming or has consumed alcoholic beverages.

(E) The designee shall be responsible for any reasonably foreseeable personal injury or property damage that is proximately caused by the consumption of alcoholic beverages by a person under 21 years of age while being supplied with transportation services if the designee knew or reasonably should have known that the person is under 21 years of age or has consumed alcoholic beverages while being supplied with transportation services.

(F) If a trip is terminated because of the consumption of alcoholic beverages by a person under 21 years of age who is a member of their party, the designee’s responsibility for that minor shall continue until that person who is under 21 years of age is returned safely to his or her home or entrusted into the care of his or her parent or legal guardian or taken to a location reasonably believed to be safer than his or her home.

(2) (A) The charter-party carrier of passengers shall provide a copy of the written form described in paragraph (4) to the chartering party and shall verify the written form has been returned with the signature of the designee no later than 72 hours prior to the commencement of the travel date. If the transportation service is prearranged within 72 hours of the travel date, the charter-party carrier of passengers shall
 immediately provide the written form described in paragraph (4) to the chartering party as a stand-alone form separate from the contract of carriage, to be returned prior to the commencement of transportation services with the signature of the designee. A charter-party carrier of passengers may supply the chartering party with additional forms for a replacement designee in the event the planned designee is unable to accompany the party during transport. The charter-party carrier of passengers shall verify the written form of a replacement designee has been returned with the signature of the replacement designee no later than 72 hours prior to the commencement of the travel date.

(B) (i) If the charter-party carrier of passengers does not provide the written notice specified in subparagraph (A), and the designee does not return the signed form prior to the commencement of the transport, the charter-party carrier of
 passengers shall do any of the following:

(I) Provide a designee who is not the driver and shall incur any and all liabilities of that designee. 

(II) Remove and lock all alcoholic beverages in the vehicle’s trunk or other locked compartment.

(III) Prohibit all persons under 21 years of age from boarding the vehicle.

(IV) Cancel the trip and refund all payments for the transportation services.

(ii) A charter-party carrier of passengers that fails to comply with clause (i) shall incur the liabilities of a designee.

(3) The charter-party carrier of passengers shall inform the driver of the vehicle that alcohol will be present
 and that there will be persons under 21 years of age present during the provision of transportation services and the name of the designee.

(4) The driver of the vehicle shall obtain the designee’s signature or initials on a written form indicating the designee’s acknowledgment and agreement to all of the following:

(A) Alcoholic beverages will be served by the chartering party or be transported in the passenger compartment of the vehicle during transportation.

(B) A member of the party to be provided with transportation services will be under 21 years of age.

(C) The person signing or initialing is the designee and is 25 years of age or older.

(D) The designee shall make reasonable efforts
 to ensure compliance with all laws prohibiting the consumption of alcoholic beverages by persons under 21 years of age who are members of the party and are not accompanied by a parent or legal guardian.

(E) The designee must check the identifications of all passengers to determine who is under 21 years of age and shall read the statement specified in paragraph (7) to each passenger in the party who is under 21 years of age. The driver will not commence transportation services until the designee has verified with the driver that the designee has checked the identifications of all passengers and has read the statement. If passengers are to be picked up at more than one location, the driver will not commence transport from the subsequent location until the designee has verified with the driver that the designee has checked the identifications of all passengers boarding the vehicle at that location and has read the statement to all passengers
 boarding the vehicle at that location.

(F) The designee is responsible for notifying the driver of the vehicle if, at any time during the trip, a passenger in their party who is under 21 years of age is consuming or has consumed alcoholic beverages and that the designee is in violation of the law if he or she fails to notify the driver.

(G) The designee is legally responsible for any reasonably foreseeable personal injury or property damage that is proximately caused by the consumption of alcoholic beverages by a person under 21 years of age while being supplied with transportation services if the designee knew or reasonably should have known that the person is under 21 years of age and is consuming or has consumed alcoholic beverages while being supplied with transportation services.

(H) If a trip is terminated because of the consumption of alcoholic beverages by a person under 21 years of age who is a member of their party, the designee’s responsibility for that person under 21 years of age continues until that person who is under 21 years of age is returned safely to his or her home or entrusted into the care of his or her parent or legal guardian or taken to a location reasonably believed to be safer than his or her home.

(5) The designee shall be a passenger of the vehicle during the provision of transportation services and shall make reasonable efforts to ensure the lawful conduct of all persons in the vehicle who are members of the party who are under 21 years of age and who are not accompanied by a parent or legal guardian.

(6) (A) The designee shall make
 reasonable efforts to ensure compliance with all laws related to the consumption of alcoholic beverages by persons in the party who are under 21 years of age and who are not accompanied by a parent or legal guardian.
